Georgia, session 2025_26, SB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 4 of Article 3 of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to ride share network services and transportation referral services, is amended in
Code Section 40-1-192, relating to transportation referral service provider registration
requirement, licensure, exemptions, and additional requirements, by revising subsection (d)
to delete "and" at the end of paragraph (9), replace the period with "; and" at the end of
paragraph (10), and add three new paragraphs to read as follows:
"(11) Provide a manner for informing a driver utilized by such transportation referral
service provider whether the location where such driver is to provide services has a violent
S. B. 311
- 1 -

LC 39 4691
crime rate greater than the current national average based upon statistics compiled by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting Program;
(12) Ensure security and privacy of personal information collected for drivers and
passengers; and
(13) Provide for a grievance process for any driver utilized by such transportation referral
service provider."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended in Code Section 40-1-193, relating to ride share network service
registration requirement, licensure, required list of all ride share drivers, additional
requirements for ride share network service businesses and drivers, and law enforcement
access to digital information in smart phone of driver, by revising subsection (c) to delete
"and" at the end of paragraph (4), replace the period with "; and" at the end of paragraph (5),
and add three new paragraphs to read as follows:
"(6) Provide a manner for informing a driver utilized by such ride share network service
whether the location where such driver is to provide services has a violent crime rate
greater than the current national average based upon statistics compiled by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting Program;
(7) Ensure security and privacy of personal information collected for drivers and
passengers; and
(8) Provide for a grievance process for any driver utilized by such ride share network
service."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 311
- 2 -